District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.44

Government vehicles; exception as to nonpayment of judgment provisions.

The provisions of § 50-1301.43 shall not apply with respect to any such judgment arising out of an accident caused by the ownership or operation with permission, of a vehicle owned by or leased to the United States, a state or any political subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia or any political subdivision of the District of Columbia.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 131, ch. 222, § 44
This section is referenced in § 50-1301.47.
1981 Ed., § 40-444.
1973 Ed., § 40-460.